Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3802
Villages; cancel contract with county; effect.

Any village entering into a contract pursuant to section 19-3801 may serve notice of its intention to cancel such contract after such contract has been in force for one year. Upon cancellation, such village shall provide its own police services.

Laws 1971, LB 594, § 2.